Utah statutes.
31A-27a-111.   Actions by and against the receiver.
(1) (a)  An allegation by the receiver of improper or fraudulent conduct
against a person may not be the basis of a defense to the enforcement of a
contractual obligation owed to the insurer by a third party.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a), a third party described in this
Subsection (1) is not barred by this section from seeking to establish
independently as a defense that the conduct is materially and substantially
related to the contractual obligation for which enforcement is sought.
(2) (a)  Subject to Subsection (2)(b), a prior wrongful or negligent action of
any present or former officer, manager, director, trustee, owner, employee, or
agent of the insurer may not be asserted as a defense to a claim by the
receiver:
(i)  under a theory of:
(A)  estoppel;
(B)  comparative fault;
(C)  intervening cause;
(D)  proximate cause;
(E)  reliance; or
(F)  mitigation of damages; or
(ii)  otherwise.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a):
(i)  the affirmative defense of fraud in the inducement may be asserted
against the receiver in a claim based on a contract; and
(ii)  a principal under a surety bond or a surety undertaking is entitled to
credit against any reimbursement obligation to the receiver for the value of
any property pledged to secure the reimbursement obligation to the extent
that:
(A)  the receiver has possession or control of the property; or
(B)  the insurer or its agents misappropriated, including commingling, the
property.
(c)  Evidence of fraud in the inducement is admissible only if it is contained
in the records of the insurer.
(3)  Action or inaction by an insurance regulatory authority may not be
asserted as a defense to a claim by the receiver.
(4) (a)  Subject to Subsection (4)(b), a judgment or order entered against an
insured or the insurer in contravention of a stay or injunction under this
chapter, or at any time by default or collusion, may not be considered as
evidence of liability or of the quantum of damages in adjudicating claims
filed in the estate arising out of the subject matter of the judgment or
order.
(b)  Subsection (4)(a) does not apply to an affected guaranty association's
claim for amounts paid on a settlement or judgment in pursuit of the affected
guaranty association's statutory obligations.
(5)  The receiver may not be considered a governmental entity for the purposes
of any state law awarding fees to a litigant who prevails against a
governmental entity.
